Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.190

Special services.

Each planning agency, subject to the approval of the board, may employ or contract with the planning consultants or other specialists for such services as it requires.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.190. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 19.]